 Everybody, Welcome to the podcast, I guess, today is dr. Andrew huberman. Andrew is a neuroscientist. He's a neurobiology professor at Stanford Medical School, and McKnight foundation, and Pew, Foundation, fellow, and the founder of huberman lab where he's involved in all kinds of really amazing breakthrough. Research on brain function, brain plasticity, and brain regeneration. His work has been published in journals. Like, Nature has been featured in Publications like time, Scientific American, the BBC and he's here today to discuss the brain to discuss, growth mindset, how to focus how to navigate these stressful times. And many other subjects. It's an incredible conversation. I think you guys are going to enjoy it. I appreciate you watching. Make sure to hit that subscribe button. And without further Ado. This is me and dr. Andrew huberman.First of all, thanks for doing this. I appreciate you coming out and my pleasure want. I'm coming. I'm glad we're doing it in person. And I think your, your, your origin story because you're a very it's your path is very unlikely your your path to becoming a scientist and I think it actually also kind of contextualizes some of the things I don't want to talk about with you today. So maybe start they're sure. So on the one hand, you know, maybe I was fated to become a scientist, the two things that are relevant. There are I always loved animals and I've always been obsessed with animal behavior. I just could watch, Cousteau shows growing up, you know, underwater life, or animals, hunting animals. Doing anything is just so fascinating to me because I'm, I think even had a really young age. I've always just been intrigued and so what drives different animals to behave in the way they do and how body form matchToo. I don't know what it was but brains and how that all works. So I've always been obsessed with animals and then my dad's a scientist. So, he's a physicist was really early in Chaos Theory. It's a growing up in our home, you know, we had scientists over for dinner and graduate students, who come over for barbecues and things like that. He was mostly a Xerox. Parc of the GUI interface, the graphic user interface, and so early days of the computer. So you got a laugh out loud in the symbolic systems, which is just a degree in kind of ecology and computation that kind of thing. So, I grew up in this family where science was very prominent and we had lots of discussions in our home that I would over here and I didn't understand about physics and we'd spend summers at the Aspen Center for physics. Which was like, yeah, soHear the word ass when you we were middle class family, but they have this a sponsor for physics. So the fine men and Richard finals. Their Murray gell-mann, like all these luminaries of physic Peter cows, and my dad was really good at telling me the stories about these guys and then I'd always want to meet them. It was mostly guys back. Then there were many women in physics. So, you know, I was thinking of immersed in science form a young age, but right about 13, my parents split up and he moved overseas move to Denmark. And my mom was really struggling with the breakup and I wasn't in contact with him anymore. So I just really unusual childhood where we can talk about sports. We talked about science and I had this close relationship with signs and the people around signs, but then all the sudden the structure around family and instead of dinner together every night. It was just like me and my mom and I was an adolescent. I was hitting puberty. So, you know, there was bound to be some shifts in my world landscape and internal Landscaping.But Paisley, what happened was, I stopped really paying attention to school, and I got really heavily in the skateboarding income, punk, rock music and I found my pack of my community Through like a pack and community of kids that also just, what kind of parent was. So this was like late 80s, early 90s. Yeah, and so it a pretty young age. I start taking that I drop it off. I was actually born at Stanford Hospital, start taking the 7Up bus up to San Francisco and hang around Embarcadero for the skateboarders. It out there. The list is, this is the now-famous EMB crowd to. This was the birth of a huge movement of skateboarders that became professionals like. So you'd see the young Danny wey would come through town or you had Rob Dyrdek. I remember when he came through and so to all these names that eventually became popular during the kind of Axe game zero and then but at that time it was really underground. And so is this pack of maybe a hundred guys and it was run like a littleAnd it was chaos. It was like there was fights and there was drinking and there was lawlessness. There's also a lot of amazing skateboarding. A lot of amazing people and there were some older guys. Like one in particular, a very famous skateboarders. This kid might Carol, his older brother was kind of like the older brother. Everybody kind of kept us all in check. So it had its own unique organization and it actually interesting cuz the same thing was happening at that time in Washington Square Park in New York and in love park in Philadelphia, they're all these like communities of kids that were basically perilous. And so in that time I saw some interesting things first of all, I learned what it was to be parent was growing up in Palo Alto. It was like soccer games and AYSO and you know swim swim club and all the sudden I realized, you know, I don't have to be home in any particular time or you know, none of these kids are going to school. And so we all is a country group of truants and it was interesting because it gave me a perspective than I never had in Palo Alto.And I was drifting further and further away from any kind of academic rigor. Right? I think I would go to school every once in awhile. What's mom doing? Does she have any idea that you're going up to the city everyday? So, she was totally checked out. I think she was just devastated by a bunch of things that were happening and she lapsed into a pretty serious depression. And then In that Community, what was interesting is, I started seeing that, you know, some guys were clearly fated to becoming professional skateboarders. They were really good at it. I just want to say for full disclosure. I was not particularly good. I kept getting injured. I just I was not fated to be at, you know, exceptional are very good at it. But I love the camaraderie and I love the community, but I also noticed that, you know, some people were drinking all day and other people got in the hard drugs and people started to, you know, some of that the dysfunction really start to show out fracture the fractured. Exactly. And so, I started seeing a lot more violence people start getting their girlfriends pregnant and have money to support those kids, you know, it started becoming apparent to me that there was a lot of dysfunction, as well as a lot of incredible people in that community. And so about that time. I got a girlfriend and the other thing was I got removed from high school. So I went to kind of the famed Infamous High School in Palo Alto Gunn High School. Done. Which is famous because it's at the one of the most academically rigorous schools in the country, may be the planet people moved to the area just to send their kids there. But it also has this very complicated reputations of high suicide rate of any school in the country that your time has run about this. So and I would come to school every once in awhile, but I could tell you far more about the curbs in the front of the high school parking lot that I could buy anything. I learned that gun or, you know, you're done. So I got shifted to another high school and that was same story. Is this was, it was a massive just fell apart. And so at one point I was brought in some vague recollection was brought in a discussion with a school counselor. And we were told there was someone sitting in the corner of this guy was sitting in the corner and he didn't introduce himself and pretty soon. I realize it was like I think they're going to take me away. Like I said realized they realized my mom wasn't really able to control. Me wasn't really in a place to support me at that time and certain, that's what they did. They took me away. They took me to a place up the peninsula, which was not a jail and it wasn't the hospital. It was the sort of place where they put kids that were like, somehow it. Anyhow, we're at we're housing situation. A lot of psychologists lot, a lot of locks on doors, lot of lot of kids that there were twelve of us in there at any one time. It was locked down and the first night there. I've never had a roommate who was like really into cutting on himself that kind of thing and he told me he's like look if you just do what they say here. You'll be out of here in like a month and if you don't need to be here a very long time and I remember being pretty frightened for the first time. And at that point, I was like, oh my goodness, like this is bad. He don't like, this is bad. I'm a long way from what I know, and, you know, and it was literally like the kind of one phone call today kind of things. Actually. I recall, I was skateboarding for a company in San Francisco. I think they put me on out of sympathy, and I called this guy up and I said, look up, they lock me up. I don't know what to do. Can you help me? And he can. And I'll never forget, I want to say his name because you're the most normal guy. I know what a crowd exactly happened. So in any event, I was permitted to go back to school eventually provided that I went to therapy. And so I started going to weekly therapy which in the early nineties was kind of a weird thing you would do, when did minute your friends but to escape around Stanford campus. I was doing my thing and then twice a week out of going into this, this therapist. He's a remarkable guy because A head deep training in the mind, right? And we start talking about what was going on and he really picked up on the fact that there was essentially no structure, no home life for me, but that I had a strong drive and I was really interested in learning. I mean, I was I was I was enthusiastic and motivated enough to eat a skateboard as hard as I could, even though I wasn't going to go anywhere with it. So what that point and the fact that I had a girlfriend, I started looking for something that I could do. And I started at one point. I thought I joined the fire service cuz it seem like the camaraderie was good. At that point. I started strengthening my body a bit because I didn't want to keep getting hurt. So I start running and start lifting weights a football coach at gun actually turns me on to Fitness session. Interested. He wrote the script for that movie. Mr. Mom, because his wife bet him that he's trying to do, what what she could do, which will stay home with the kids, and he was this big strong, football coach. And so, you made her bad in there and he lost. And so you wrote that script, Michael Keaton played Yeah, but he taught me he was like look, you know, you can't even do a pull-up. You need to start doing your place when you start running, you know, and he said the fire service might be good for you. So I was spinning out, but there were people that were willing to come in a point me in the right direction. So, what ended up happening was my high-school girlfriend, went off to college and I didn't, you know, I know what I was going to do. So I actually went in and I lived in the parking lot, outside her dormitory. I just want to be near her. She was my family that at that point, the college locally or at she was at UC, Santa Barbara drove down and I just drove down in the parking lot. And I was starting to get into some martial arts in Thai boxing then so I think I was teaching some Thai boxing self-defense stuff on campus and doing this kind of thing. And by the end of that year, I realized I should probably apply to college. So I applied to UCSB Somehow I got in. Lord knows how I got in. I did it, cuz I did eventually graduate high school, barely got in. And then after a year, I just completely flailed it. You know, I wasn't going to class. I was getting in a fight, a lot of that kind of kind of mischief and kind of wildness was still in me. And what ended up happening was. I got into a physical altercation on July 4th 1994 with like a bunch of guys and at the end of that, I walked back to the place I was staying and of course I wasn't paying rent because I learned in those ears like you can just an empty house. So, you know that I love is here at all for Nia, you know, so, huh. I was really running wild and went back and just I realize I was like this picture is really bad, you know at some point this isn't going to be like a kid who had some problems. This is going to be truly a cute. It's not about your upbringing or the lack of parenting just becomes You're going to end up being a ward of the state. I mean, you worth it. Sounds like you're almost of a feral animal. Totally failed actually, and some close friends that that's how they, they refer to me. And it's funny, even to this day. I mean, I'll get to where this eventually took me. But even to this day, when I go into a home where it's clearly, like a loving home, where there's kids are happy, and there's good food, and it's warm and cozy. I always feel this thing. Like, wow, like amazing, like I so want to be adopted by them immediately, but I am 45 years old. So that's not appropriate. In this case. I keep thinking about David Epstein's book range. Did you read this book? Which is basically this thesis that some of the most successful people are not in a week. We suspect that, you know, the great talents of of the world across all disciplines, are the people who discover their passion at an early age and practice it voraciously for many, many, many years, but in fact, It's people more like yourself who dabbled in all different kinds of things who end up being ultimately, you know, the most proficient at their selected skill set. And when I look at your experience, i c, e trauma, I see Adventure. I see, you know, all these obstacles that you had to face and overcome and and manage on your own essentially, right? And all of those really inform perfectly the things that you're interested in and what you explore today in your lab. Yeah. It really did. You know, I think that I'm so grateful for those years. I wouldn't wish them on any kid because I think having a secure loving environment at home is Sookie. And now I should say about a third of the kids that I grew up with, in that environment, that whole skateboarding, punk rock culture on a third of gone on to found companies or professional skateboarders. About a third just kind of drifted off in about a third or dead or incarcerated. Yeah, you know, a huge number and so there's no value in having a support system, that's clear, but expose me to all these things like a diction. Schizophrenia rage like all these incredible elements. Like I was never really into drinking and drugs. I could drink or not. Drink it since was it wasn't gone too. But other people they took one step and I was like that was their thing right at the magic Elixir for them. And so, you know, I was observing what was happening and then after that, you know, that July 4th 94 incident was this is it, you know, it's now or never really was one of those moments, you know, you care about those moments, but it was me realizing I'm living in the squad. I've got a pet ferret. My girlfriend's gone. She broke up with me. She was smart enough to break up with me. You know, I'm getting in fights. I'm working at a bagel shop. I'm barely making ends meet. And at that point. I just made the decision. I just said, okay, like I'm I'm not going to professional athlete. I think I'm pretty good at memorizing things. I think I have an interest in people. I'm going to just decide I just decided to do school. I decide that was that that was the traffic is so like something to put the military because it's Like if you know what to expect at least in terms of the unit, the passages that you're going to go through and for me that was school. And so I decided to get back in school. I moved into a studio apartment by myself. I quit partying completely. I didn't go to parties. I got really serious about Fitness. So I just started running and lifting weights. And I studied you went like Henry Rollins style. I did. Yeah, I did. I did not have self-awareness. You know, I mean people go into the military because on some level. I mean some people do because they're there, some yearning for having that structure imposed upon their lives, but you, you constructed that, that kind of structure for yourself. I think I was really afraid. I think I was like, you know, night and these days, you know, cuz my lab studies fear and I get into this whole thing around mindset. People always ask me like it's better do something from a place of Love or fear, like depends. And that point fear was the best motivator for me. And I just basically worked like crazy and and it's interesting because I didn't have a mentor. Someone to bring me to that. But once I started doing that, you know, there was one professor in particular who got took note. He was like, oh, you know, you seemed really interested in this outfit was like, yeah, cuz he was teaching me about depression, schizophrenia neurochemicals. I thought I was totally turned on by the world of Neuroscience. It didn't with him call. Neuroscience back then. But this one guy. Hurry Carlyle is teach me about thermal regulation and how the brain works and how receptors in the skin related Perceptions in the mind. And and and he also had a deep sensitivity to mental disease. And I seen a lot of that, you know, I'd seen a lot of depression and anxiety my own family. I'd had a friend. Commit suicide, not a friend become schizophrenic. He still walk in the Mission District in San Francisco. Now, seems our friends become addicts and so, here was it. Someone explaining that there's actually an underlying basis for this, and I just poured myself into that the same guy who who smoke underneath the vacuum hood and stuff like that. Like a bit of an iconoclast. Yeah. He was amazing. So he was up at favorite teacher or many students. If you could get into his lab, then you were going to one of the chosen ones. I guess. It's like a perfect Mentor at the perfect time for you to drink coffee and lab supposed to do. Smoke cigarettes in lab before any in the fume hood and needs to come and yell at him and he would do it anyway, and I thought, you know, this guy doesn't even know what it is. But you need to punk rocker, doesn't even know. And so he gave me an opportunity to work in his lab. And that some point, he told me, if you go to graduate school, they'll actually pay you to do science. And what ended up happening that point was I hit a brick wall because I was, I had a lot of resentment toward my dad. I thought, you know, here's my daddy was a scientist to you in a left us all this kind of thing. And I realized, if I didn't do this, if I didn't take this opportunity, it was indeed a most foolish thing ever. You know, what am I going to swipe, my, you know, right? My parents. Because, you know, I was 20 years old at that point. So I just made the decision. I'm going to get a PhD and become a professor. I might get tenure. Imma be like this guy, you know, that this guy who is look like you had a pretty good life to me. And so, that's pretty much how I spent the last twenty-five years of my life is do an experiment, worked out. Have the power of concentration. I hadn't read all the good books that got high school, students, redrawing up. I had to learn how to speak properly. Learn how to learn how to think properly, and really learn how to commit to something that was very linear. And at times was very painful, and and I went to some pretty extreme anxiety, you know, I actually used to set a timer and I won't allow myself to get out of the chair until I was the timer went off right now and I would experience extreme agitation, but over time I got pretty good and now I can do long stints of work without any breaks and yeah, it worked out. It'll develop that that neural plasticity in your favor. Ultimately. You are always a reader though, right? I love book. So I would you know, I would hide in the tower books section in the evenings and I would read everything about Fitness psychology, anything. I could, I've always devoured information. My favorite book when I was a kid was the encyclopedia for the Guinness Book of World Record. Do you like when I was a little kid? I'd walk around the Aspen Center for physics and I would tell anyone, I didn't even ask him if they want to hear about like it. What's the world's smallest you Theory and mammal, you know, you could tell you all these facts that we're kind of at the time. But I've always been fascinated by the inventory of different animals, on the planet, and their different behaviors. And so yeah, voracious reader and still. Now, I love, I love him. Well, as a neuroscientist and mean you're at your, your, your own patient. I mean the fact that you were able to, you know, turn your life around in such a dramatic fashion and do it essentially through sheer will and you know, setting up practices that would feel you you and that right direction and then being available when those Men tour showed up from that from the early therapist, sounds like that guy. Almost save your life. Give me the book wherever you go. There you are, and he said no pressure. But if you can develop a mindfulness practice where you can sit still, 10 minutes a day. It'll serve you very well. So I started doing that. Like it was a, it was a self-preservation thing with kicking in for me. So I got very interested in mindfulness meditation. He also said it was I think quite smart and saying, look, there's a whole world of psychedelic drugs that are powerful in influencing the mind. He said, if you're going to explore those wait until your brain has already developed, which I think is a controversial statement in and of itself is. So we actively discouraged me to go down that path which I think was the right thing to do, and I was a minor, you know, and nowadays, there's all this discussion, know about psychedelics and their power, and I think they are very interesting compounds, but he really steer me towards behavioral practices. What could I do each day from waking up to going to sleep? That would serve my mental health in my productivity. Well, right. Yeah, I owe him a tremendous amount and especially because he was in In the psychoanalytic theory. He also gave your all he understood. The power practice is not just discussing. How to begin a meditation practice at that age in the mid-90s. That's pretty radical. Yeah. I felt it was a funny cuz I thought if I didn't sit in the Lotus position, like I wasn't doing it properly, you know, back then, there was all this stuff in my family cuz my dad's very conservative and my mom is a little bit more of a free spirit. I was taught that anything that related to hippie culture was doomed to fail and cause problems. And that anything that was related to lie, conservative culture was fated to advance the progress of humanity lift weights, Ron meditate. Do your school work? Do your homework? And so I think I ate, you know, I now have a good relationship with my parents. But I think I had to go out into the world and find those sort of paternal and maternal figures because they weren't in my home. I need to see you. Look back on your upbringing with gratitude. Like how do you reflect on that experience and how it informs? You know, how you think about what you do. Now? I'm immensely grateful for it because where I'm at today is, you know, my lab works on a number of issues related uniserve. Hardcore, neurobiology of regenerating the brain, you know, trying to fix this lecture blindness and repair visual systems, but also things related to you. No fear, courage, mindset stress anxiety, trauma, etcetera. And The early seed of seeing how science is done, definitely gave me an advantage. I won't lie, you know, I seen how scientists interact and behave and understanding that they are just people cuz a lot of what was discussed in my home was about the people, not just the signs. They do that really gave me an advantage and then seeing all that that dysfunction and realizing that the human animal is amazing at making plans at modifying, its brain. If it wants to put the human brain in the human animal are all so dreadfully, bad, at doing, what's best for us, right, because of this, what I think it comes down to is the fact that our reward systems are not designed for things that are just good for us, their design for things that optimizes the progression of our species, but they're also, they will grab onto and Ratchet into any behavior that makes us feel good. And so the human brain is really not optimized for making best choice of Rights. Are those years of seeing all that his function and I wouldn't trade those years for anything and I still have great friends in that Community. I mean, I think, you know, any, how do I join the different Community? I would have found the right people as well. But to be with, you know, a huge pack of feral kids at that age and a see, the function and dysfunction in and also is wild. It was a lot of fun. I can imagine. It was a lot of fun, huh? That's a whole another time. And the movie kids, the lyrics barking when I saw that movie for. So I have a lot of friends over in that movie cuz he use actual skateboarders. Yeah. I actually know a couple of those kids and, you know, it's a movie but there were a lot of things by the movie. They're very yeah. Yeah. And when I saw that movie, I was like, yeah, that's like pretty much a day in the life in Washington Square Park in the, you know, I mean, there's a little extreme on the, on top, on some in, but you didn't know. You going to help each night? That was unique experience, you know, so yeah and mid-nineties was really good. I think it captured the essence of what is to be a kid. That's just looking for some some group of people to join and skateboards at unique sport because you get young kids and grown men and now women and girls do it as well. It wouldn't happen so much then but now they're a lot of great awesome skateboarders that are female but they're all hang out together. You wouldn't find that in soccer. You're not the little kids playing with grown men do get exposed to a lot cuz everyone to develop different developmental stages. But yeah, it was amazing. I wouldn't change it for anything. Cool. Well, let's, let's segue into talking about the brain and maybe we could start with, you know, how you think about the brain specifically, like, what is the brain? What does it do? What is it not? Do, you know, it helps us survive? It's our portal into trying to make sense of the world. Like what's the starting point in the discussion around the brain yesso? The brain and nervous system, which so it's like brain spinal cord connections with the body and Becky and I don't distinguish between Brandon mind. I think that's like a 80s discussion or earlier and I think it would take us down the wrong track. So bring her mind to me is interchangeable. Mind body is kind of interchangeable because the brain is connected to the body and the bodies connected the brain, right? If I like being a pin prick, my hand and it hurts. My brain register. Is it where it happens? If a bit irrelevant discussion, I think we really need to just appreciate that. The nervous system is designed to orchestrate all the processes in the body. Not just thinking and not just Behavior. I really can be divided into five things. So their sensation And sensation is really bound, or restricted by The receptors in the body. So receptors in the eye that Percy photons, light energy receptors in the skin that perceive pressure, touch receptors smell, taste. Cetera. And the interesting thing about sensation and the fact of the nervous system needs to pay attention. Sensation is it's non-negotiable. The nervous system of humans is designed to extract physical phenomenon from the universe that are non-negotiable photons of light. I can't see in the infrared with my eyes, and I can see ultraviolet light with my eyes, and I can't perceive that because I don't have the receptors for it. So, you know, other animals can perceive some of those things. But that leads us to the next thing, which is perception, which is, which Sensations are you paying attention to do all the time? You're sensing things. Like right now your feet are sensing the contact with your shoes, but you're not thinking about until I say that and then you shift your perception and perception is like the spotlights of the brain wants to constantly bring incense. Non-negotiable, what's coming in? Your environment, perception is negotiable. You can control that cuz I just said choose and you thought about your feet and there you are. Then their feelings, which could be a little bit nebulous, but feelings are a link between our emotion and generally invokes, The Body Sensations in the body and Concepts in the mind of what those Sensations about. That's really what emotions are animals. Definitely experienced them kind of appalled to think that ten years ago, people. I do animals have emotion. Of course, they have emotions, right? Because those are bodily. Sensations merged with some perceptions. Of course they do and then their thoughts and thoughts are interesting because thoughts happen. Spontaneously think about like a web browser, that's constantly giving your pop-ups but fog can also be deliberate. So you, and I can decide right now that we're going to think about a plan for something. We're going to think about what's going on in the world. So thoughts happen spontaneously and they can be deliver it. And then the final thing is behaviors, and actions of the nervous system is responsible for sensation perception, feelings, thoughts and behaviors. And what's interesting thing about that you like? Okay, that's a lot. What is the nervous system really trying to accomplish like on any given day or at any moment. What's a trying to accomplish and it's really trying to accomplish one thing which is to take perceptions of the outside world and merge. Those with perceptions of the inside world. We call interoception and to link those in a way that's operating on an environment, in the appropriate, way to what I mean by that. So if I'm feeling anxious and I'm in a very common wire meant I'm going to perceive that rapid heart rate and kind of feeling of agitation in my body has inappropriate for the moment, right? And my goal then, as a, as an organism is to adjust my, my level of what they call autonomic arousal, Ernest down. If I'm in it yet, I break party or a wedding or it's a celebration or I'm at a protester, you know, then I might feel that my level of alertness is appropriate for my bar. Mitzvah. The nervous system is in this constant dynamic in Iraq. Can with the outside world and trying to figure that out. When we ended it. This can be kind of conceptualize if there's an emerging idea that's kind of interesting about impatience. So we've always had the feeling of being in. Some people are far more patient than others. But if you've ever been in line at the store and you feel like something's going very slowly and other person in front of his taking a long time. They're doing some returns. You're getting kind of impatient. We were breathing and I'm asking you like, uh, like your what's the idea is that if you're getting a certain frequency of Pulses from your body and if those pulses are coming in quickly, like you're perceiving yourself that interception quickly. It's like pulse pulse. You're going to be more geared towards your internal representation. And then you're seeing what's going on in the outside world and it seems like it's going very slowly. But there are other times when you're in line at the store. Someone's getting some returns and you're texting on your phone and you had a great day, better day, run in your family is in great shape, and you're fine. Why will that frequency of those pulses that interest? Is mashed pretty well to your outside environment. And so impatience is really when you're in internal sort of metronome is not match well to the external environment. There are other times when you're feeling like your internal metronome is tic, tic tac and you got a million things coming at you through email or texting. I want you thinking you're feeling overwhelmed and tired. Well, in either case, there's nothing right or wrong. It's just your body in your brain or trying to say what's going on in the outside world. How well matched. Am I to it? Right? So, If you think about some of that the core practices of mindfulness and self-regulation of focusing on breathing or focusing on on, you know, state of mind, a lot of that is trying to bring more awareness to your internal state. But what a brain is normally doing when their eyes are open, and we're in Iraq, in the world is where consol trying to update our internal state to match external demands of the world. And this Harkens back to it. You'll like a really early design of all nervous systems, which is how do you take an organism that need certain things, food water mates, reproduction shelter. How do you move that organism? How do you create a system that will do that industrialization to the environment? And so what Mother Nature is done is designed as a series of systems wants to take agitator and stress for one if an animal or human is very thirsty. You feel kind of agitating might get up and get a drink of water. If you're very thirsty. It can put you into a state of panic if you're extremely thirsty, and water is a limited resource, you might even result in violence to get it or negotiation of some sort that, you wouldn't, if you were, so that stress and agitation were designed to actually mobilize the body to take us in his Directions. Something that's adopted. You can start to see these kind of core elements of what the brain and nervous system. Do sensation, perception feeling thought and action. And this constant challenge of trying to match our internal state to the external real estate the outside world. And you start to see that the sensations that we call stress, or impatience were calm, are really the result of those attempts that the nervous system is trying to perform. That's a lot to take in and super interesting and it, you know, it's prompting and me this. You know, attempt to try to wrap my head around, what within the brain is mutable, which is kind of, you know, what your work is all about versus, what is immutable like you were talking about thoughts, like, pop-up windows on a browser. You know, it's sometimes our brains are just doing what they do and that there are things that we can do like mindfulness and breathwork in the practices that you're talkin about hypnosis, which is another thing that you're involved in to help. Help us, like, take better manage better, that process to kind of take the reins and be more in charge, rather than feed pray or victim to these kind of things that just occur without our conscious awareness. I think that You know, terms of value of understanding the nervous system and where it can be steered. It's absolutely clear that the nervous system can change in response to experience. So this thing we call neuroplasticity is really that is the brain's ability to modify itself in response to experience. And I think it's important understand that from birth till about age 25. The brain is extremely malleable. And it kind of all most passive way where kids are exposed to things in my brain is just wiring up. I'm in the brain is really designed to adjust itself in order to be in concert with its surroundings and to optimize that just the way we just wrap him in a way that a child can learn a language. Very quickly are real anger without an accent languages, without an accent. It's remarkable in trying to do that after age 25. It's very challenging and so The brain is basically designed to be customized in the early part of life and then to implement those algorithms in that circuitry for the rest of your of its life. And so the brain can change in adulthood and it can change provided that there's an emphasis on some perceptual event. So in other words, if you want to change your brain as an adult, let's say you want to be less anxious, you want to learn a new language, you want to be more functional in some way. Presumably the key thing is to bring Focus to some particular perception of something that's happening during the learning process. And the reason for that is that there's a neurochemical system involving acetylcholine and it comes from these two nuclei down in the base of the brain called nucleus by Salas. All day long, you're doing things in a reflexive way. But when you do something in, you think about it, very intensely, acetylcholine is released from bacillus at the precise neurons that were involved in that behavior and it marks those for change during sleep or drink deep rest later. So for people that want to change their brain, the power of focus is really the entry point and the ability to access depressed and sleep, because most people don't realize this, but neuroplasticity of triggered by intense Focus, but neuroplasticity occurs during deep sleep and rest. And we can talk about how to optimize those different brain functions. One of the things that's really important. Also, think about how the brain works in terms of plasticity and all the stuff is what the brain really wants to do is also pass as much of what it does off to reflexive Behavior as possible. So I think I can get a little bit vague but it might be useful thing about like what exactly is focus and what triggers plasticity. So The brain love to be able to just do things, pick up coffee cups, and drink and walk and talk, and do things, and not put much energy into it. When we decide to focus with the brain really does his switches on a set of circuit that brought the frontal cortex and nucleus, pasaulis and some others and is trying to understand duration, how long something's going to last path. What's going to happen and outcome, what ultimately, it's going to happen. So it's rationed pathan outcome, you know, the event of early 2020 are good example, that's one of the reasons why it's so exhausting to be alive in 2020 is because we are now having to pay attention to duration passing out, How long is this thing going to last winter? You know, when are they going to open up all businesses? Did I touch that door handle? Does it matter you describe who are the experts? Are there, any experts you are a lot of questions, where as normally we can just move through life without having to do all that. And so, if it's a simple example, I trying to learn a new language or a new motor skill or a new Conceptualizing. Something maybe somebody is sitting at therapeutic process and they're trying to work through a trauma or something like that. And outcome is built into the networks of the brain. We can do that very easily but it takes work. And it almost has a feeling of underlying agitation and frustration. And that's because of the circuits that turn on before, acetylcholine art of the stress system. So when you were, I said, we're going to learn something really dig in norepinephrine, which is adrenaline, is secreted in the brain stem and in the body, and it brings about a state of alertness. Then our attention, which is mostly a diffuse. Light is brought to a particular duration path and I'll coming out. This, this will be thinking about what somebody is saying, what are they really trying to say hard passage of reading a hard instead of math problems, you know, a challenging physical work out. When you do that, these two systems have to work very hard and the adult brain doesn't really want to change the algorithms. It learned in childhood. But if you do those two things, Have alertness and focus the acetylcholine and the norepinephrine converge to Mark the synopsis for Change. And so the way to think about neuroplasticity, if one wants to change their brain is bring about the most intense concentration. You can to something. And then later bring about the least amount of concentration to that thing. So I'll talk about that in a second. But there was some studies that we're done at Stanford by guy named Eric, Knudsen that showed that plasticity in the, in the adult brain. Any age can be as robust as it is in childhood as fast and as traumatic provided. The focus is there and it's all contingent on this. Acetylcholine molecule coming from new Christmas albums. Do you say, how do you do that? Well, I've got friends that you not going to get them there. Because Nicorette is in nicotinic, acetylcholine Agonist, but that's going to globally, increase, acetylcholine. So I always tell them that's not the right approach. The right approach is to bring as much fun. Crystal Behavior, what you thought or to an action pattern, and there has to be a sense of urgency. So what Knutson lab showed and not allowed at UCSF. Mike Merson. Xlab showed is that if there's a serious contingency, like, in order to get your ration of food, each day, you have to learn this thing. The degree of plasticity is remarkable, right? But if there isn't an incentive, it just isn't going to happen. So these circuits in the brain, that mother nature setup are designed to be anchored to a real need. And people always say to me. Well, should I do something out of love and a real desire to learn, or should it be out of fear, but either one works, the sense of urgency is just a single calling norepinephrine. That's all it is. It doesn't the brain doesn't have a recognition of whether or not something is pleasure for not until later. Once you start accomplish in your goal, the reward systems like dopamine start kicking in but I think if people are interested in modifying their brain for the better. At least some, you know, top Contour understanding of how Urgent C and focus must converge for that to happen. Can be useful because I think there's a lot of attention paid to whether or not something feels like slow or whether or not to see what I called highly desirable or whether or not you can you can eat a plant out of the ground that will magically put your brain into a state of plasticity. And the answer is yes, such plants exist, but what's missing is the focus component if that work is not done with a particular end goal in mind, you'll get plasticity, but you'll get plasticity in a kind of across-the-board. It's like learning nine, lengths, learning a little, bit of nine languages. All at once, is not going to make you speak, coherently in any one of them. So focus is the key, right? I mean, this idea flow is so much in the vernacular now and you know, my my sense is that people are trying to measure their their level of Engagement against some sort of theoretical idea of what it's like. Be in that flow State. And if they're not experiencing it, they feel like they're doing it wrong at were there or they they they feel guilty or they beat themselves up. And for me it's a lot of it is just hard work like right now. I'm trying to finish this book and I should have been working on this book for like the last nine months. Right? And I just couldn't couldn't get it together. Like it's a collaborative project. So there's a lot of different people that are involved in and they've been working diligently for a daily, you know, putting this thing together and I just been focusing on the podcast and been unable to immerse myself in this project because I know from past Book Project. When I go in, I go all in like the addict in me kicks in and it's like it just becomes my universe and I've been completely paralyzed from taking out on. And so I've gathered away most of the quarantine without being productive on this project. And then about ten days ago. We had a meeting and we establish this deadline at, you know, how to turn this thing in. And it was like a switch got flicked, and I went all-in and it's all I can think about now, and in fact, everything else feels like extraneous and a distraction. I just want to get back. I can focus on this thing and ten days ago. I couldn't get myself into that position and it's made me think about like what is going on in my brain that, you know, it's such a drastic State change. And what did I do to switch that while a deadline was imposed upon me and whatever happened to Errol? Chemically with that set in motion, like a chain reaction of events, that got me into the chair. And once I began the project for me, it's all about like momentum, right? It's, it's like to start getting to the starting line and beginning is so hard, like I will just go forever without doing it. And then I'm in and then I'm all in a hundred and 10%, and I'm like, why can't I just why can't I be that person who just worked on it, you know, an hour and a half every day for the last 3 months, but I can offer some potential explanations. I can relate Cheap Salma Hayek who originated the state thing? If love is really nothing. But I say right now the most we can say about Flo and Ed mechanistically is backwards. It is felt wolf. We don't really understand flow come up with these theories. It's like being a hypo hyper. Frontality. I haven't seen the data and I'm not picking on him. I'm putting that out. There is a prompt for people to discover this. I think that and to work on it. I think they're really interesting, highly desirable state, but I think we need to get comfortable as a as a culture in trying to understand our species and how we work that the early stages of hard work and focus are going to feel like agitation stress and confusion, because that's the norfenefrine and adrenaline system kicking in. None of us would expect to walk into the gym and do our PR left, or, you know, about performer, go do something without warming up the brain. Also needs to warm up and start to hone in which circuits are going to be active. And it's, it's unreasonable for us to think. I've got an hour. I'm going to Write beautifully for an hour or my best work. We need to accept that. There's a period of agitation and stress that accompanies. The dropping into these highly concentrated States in terms of the reward that accompanies the feeling that were funneling into that, that groove of a being productive. In in one regime like for you writing this book, The dopamine system is really important understand that we talked about norepinephrine trying to get you going to see the colon is the spotlight of attention. The dopamine system is Mother Nature's. Hardwired ancient system in all animals including humans to put us on the right path. Now, it's a lot of people talk about dopamine as this thing that you get when you publish the book or when you get the book deal or when something wonderful happens, like if your child is born and that's true, but dopamines main role is to be released. Anytime you achieve a milestone or you think you're on the right path and when the dopamine system is Tethered to a particular Focus remember duration pathan outcome. So it's like how you sit down if you don't get much text out. But then the next day you get 800 words of really solid text. You feel good. Like I'm into this. What does that dopamine system? Do the dopamine system takes the norepinephrine, which is normally rate-limiting like, at some point. There's so much norepinephrine that you quit, we can talk about that. It's actually that the substrate for quitting dopamine can push that noradrenaline back down. That adrenaline back down and give you more room more space to do duration. Pathan outcome work. Highly focused work and I'm making duration, path, outcomes synonymous with highly focused work. Why would this happen? So let's think about an animal, a thing about a deer that wakes up and it's thirsty. And it's wondering out looking for water that animal needs water. He doesn't know that it needs water. It experiences. Agitation the same way that a baby feels agitation when it wants food, but it doesn't know it needs food. It just feels agitation and cries and caretaker comes, hopefully, that deer is now foraging for something that it needs, and let's say, it smells water, cuz you're can actually do that and arrives to the stream and takes a sip of water. There's dopamine release, then that puts it on a path to maybe a larger Lake, or something of that sort, or to be able to go cheap food. So, when we are on the right path and we hit a milestone, dopamine is released and it tends to tighten our focus more for that activity. So, the dopamine this is why drugs of abuse and why alcoholism and some your process addictions with your behavior. Addictions are so dangerous because they a lot of those drugs of abuse our dopamine. So it becomes this gloop where there's no other Behavior. That can devote the same level of release right to find addiction as a progressive narrowing of the things that bring you pleasure, and I say that because it really is the way that the dopamine system works. Normally, the dopamine system is designed to be. Generic is designed to get me to do lots of things, social quality, social interactions, you know, work exercise, all those things. Just like the stress system is designed to get me out of bed in the morning. Cortisol pulse is what gets me out of bed in the morning. It's also what leads me to wear led me to pursue a career in science out of fear and initially, and eventually pleasure. So, the dopamine system is Tethered to those states of focus and it's what Mother Nature designed. So that the neural plasticity would occur and you would want to continue those behaviors again in the future that dear needs to know and remember and create a memory not just of where that stream is, but the process of all, when I feel that education, I'm going to get up and go down this particular path. And so people think of the dopamine system as this kind of like catch-all for reward. Do you get likes on Instagram? And it makes you feel good. That's not really how it works. An important understand is when you start getting a convergence of norepinephrine. So that level of agitation, duration path, outcome, acetylcholine, and dopamine. Now, you're starting to wire in the behaviors that make people really good at certain things. Now in a functional view with us or not addiction. What this means is that for any of us success in any Endeavor, is very closely related to how much Focus we can bring to that endeavor and the reward system you start to realize is entirely internal. No one's coming along and cramming dopamine in your ear or dripping it in your brain. It's all internal and this starts to bring us into the kind of like discussion around mine, sets ESO my calling Carol, dweck who popularized the growth mindset. That is the idea that we can change. So, that's built into that. But the discovery of growth mindset was of these kids that actually really enjoyed doing problem sets that they knew they couldn't get right. But For them, they would get this like dopamine released from just focusing on the problem. They like doing puzzles. They couldn't get right. It sounds crazy. But inevitably those kids are very good at puzzles and very good at math. And then these kinds of things. So growth mindset is, I believe it was her manner of Neuroscience lens on growth mindset, would be that the agitation and stress that you feel at the beginning of something. And when you're trying to lean into and you can't focus is just to recognize gate, you have to pass that through that gate, to get to the focus component. And then if you can reward the effort process, you really start to feel Joy and low levels of of excitement in the effort process. That's that buffering of adrenaline. That's that feeling like yes. I've got a lot of adrenaline, my system, but I'm on the right path. It feels good to walk up this hill so I can only start to bring that those neural circuits together. You really start to create a whole set of circuits that are designed to be exported to any Behavior you want. So if it Writing a book. Great, if it's podcasting great, if it's building a business, great. If it's if it's, you know, building a terrific relationship, great, the circuits that mother nature is designer. Incredibly generic so that we could adapt to whatever it is that we need to do. And I think the misunderstanding around how these circuits work has led to this idea that there's some secret entry point, maybe Mark flow on the door and there's a trampoline up to that door and you just open that door and you're going to be in it and nothing could be further from the truth. And anyone who's done. Well in any career or athletic Pursuit knows this, but unfortunately, there's a kind of obsession with the idea that it's all supposed to feel good and it does feel good. But there's a whole staircase in which it feels kind of lousy. The feel-good aspect of that experience is very subtle and I think, you know, in a kind of global way, what you're talking about is falling in love with the process. Like you have to push this gate open, which might require you no more. Then you're comfortable with. But once you push through, it is about, you know, that daily, the daily rigor and the tiny wins that you get from that rather than you do. It's easy to see how you set a goal, but that girl becomes very abstract. Right? And it's those tiny little things that you're getting done everyday that bring you that internal satisfaction that are like calibrating that and plasticity. That what you're saying. Yeah, absolutely. And what's incredible is the extent to which the mind and thoughts. Remember earlier to tell you about how farts are spontaneous. You can't control them negative thoughts from attic thoughts, bad thoughts. Trying to suppress those is futile. If there's one message I can send people, it's just don't even work at that. But work at the process of introducing thoughts as almost like he would introduce actions because we can introduce thoughts. And you know, Carol dweck has talked about this. That positive self-talk is not the same thing as growth mindset because positive self-talk is almost always linked to the ultimate outcome. If I'm losing Godly and something, when I tell myself, I'm doing great. I know that I'm lying. There's no dopamine-releasing that and, you know, a lot of the self-help Wellness culture of the 80's and 90's like it's impossible to be in a bad mood. If you're smiling, we won't have any depression on the planet. If that's true. There's probably some feedback from the face of the brain, but it's not that simple. But the idea that you can self reward the effort process is extremely powerful because what it means is that if you can recognize agitation, stress and confusion as an entry point to where you eventually want to go. I do think that just that even just mental recognition can allow people to pass through it more easily. They think they're doing something wrong, and then, rewarding yourself when you achieve any Milestone like, you know, running to a particular location. If you're trying to run a long distance and then registering that as a partial win, What we know is that the dopamine that's released in response to that suppresses the total amount of adrenaline and gives you more room more time or energy to run in eggs in. This is anchored in a real scientific results. The last year there was a paper published since she was asking, why any human or animal quit at any Behavior. Now, certain behaviors, like I can't lift. The car place is very small car can't with the car. But if it's running or were talking about long bouts of work, question is why do we quit? Like, what is that? It turns out that every time we exert effort, a certain amount of noradrenaline in the brain is released and there's a sort of a counter in the brainstem and at some point enough noradrenaline is released and it shuts down cognitive control, deliberate control over the motor circuitry, and we quit, that's it. But the thing that can restore those levels or it, can you serve reset those levels lower and give us more gas, more mileage. Dopamine and it makes perfect sense because our species had to move against very challenging things in in nature. And in the service of a culture at every stage of our Evolution. Including now 2020 is a good example this and when a good example would be if you're really slogging it out and things are miserable just things like the worst family vacation. Everything is a disaster or a very hard physical event. And someone cracks a joke, you're almost immediately feel a sense of relief. You see this in the team that wins the Super Bowl both teams, slugged it out. You have to believe they were both at Max effort, the entire game. Look at the team that wins. They have extra energy. They're jumping all over the place. So it can't be physical energy. Can't be glycogen related is not Ketone related. It's nothing in the body. In that sense. It's dopamines ability to take that level of norepinephrine and smack it back down. And so we can learn this, right? I'm at the, I think this is where there's real power like, in your story of the store that I'm familiar with from your book like the the ability to push through those pain points is something that we really can export to other aspects of life because it's the same neural chemicals that are involved. So when you get to a particular location, you or maybe your recall, you know, a portion where you're just, you're feeling lousy, you know, you're injured or you feel like you're hurt and you can refrain it mentally. And think I'm actually still on the ladder. I'm still holding on to a wrong 90, at least that much. I'm still breathing. I know that much and that the lift that we get is not some psychological pump up. It's a neurochemical thing. It's dopamine suppressing norepinephrine and saying you're on the right path, you can keep going. It's a permission to keep going and we grant that permission to ourselves. No one grant that permission to us. I think one of the other kind of misconceptions that we want to dissolve. Is this idea that external rewards can actually Propel us down long past of a success and high performance that they can't not so yeah. I have a friend from the SEAL Teams and somebody asked us recently were giving it a talk and somebody said, how can I make sure that I continue to self reward and I'm not driven by these extra rewards. How can I continue to have that drive and his answer was a very good. He said give away all the external rewards. Do you know? Now, not everyone can afford to do that about you and you just you and you and the more attached. If there's a famous Stanford study done, it being Nursery School. Probably not far away from where you were in the dormitory. There's a little Nursery School in Escondido Village and they did the study where they look at kids that like to playing during their recess. It's all recess in nursery school, but they're drawing. And they took the kids that really like to draw. And they started giving them little gold stars on their drawings and then they like the gold stars for a kid. That's an extrinsic rewards, and then they stopped doing that and the kids stopped drawing. They just they they are associated the good feeling of doing it with the external rewards. We have to be very cautious about how much of our internal dopamine. We attached external rewards, if we want to continue to grow and pursue and focus and work hard, if you just want to get to some place in cash in then, fine, but most people find themselves in a pretty miserable place because their dopamine was so attached to external Rewards. They need more and more of the Y has to be deeper than that. I mean this thing that that I kind of always default to when I hit that breaking point or, you know, I'm training arm raising or whatever. And I'm at that stage where it's just like, I can't go any further. The first thing I do is I reflect in word on why I'm doing this to begin with like what is the, what is the value system that I'm trying to tap it and it, what is it? That I'm trying to express, like what got me to this point. So it's a reminder and then I just set like I just say well I'm just going to get to the next Lamppost or I'm going to eat get to the the next intersection or whatever it is. I break it down into the tiny out all quit after that. Like the more I can just route myself in the present moment and and distill it down into the tiniest of digestible chunks. That's the only way I can you know continue to move forward and I've learned over time that the more I do that then, you know, it's suddenly all find myself in a different. Like it will shift, right? Just because I feel that way in that moment is not determinate of of how I'm going to feel 10 minutes later. Absolutely, there. There's an interesting process that, that occurs when people start to realize that rewards are all internal. And what they start to do is they start linking this duration path outcome thing to their internal rewards. And so, to put the simply one of the most powerful things that any person can do is to learn to control this idea of duration path and I'll come and attach an internal sense of reward. Just that you're doing well to reward yourself. Mentally just say I'm doing well. I'm actually on the right path to do that. Inside of the demands that come from the external world. The more often that we can self reward, some aspect of the process provided in the right direction of what we're trying to achieve. The more energy. We're going to have for that the more Focus we're going to have for that. And remember that the reason I take energy, I don't throw that away. Loosely. Is that limiting amount of noradrenaline is constantly being kept at Bay. You're literally keep buffering the quick response. And so when people start realizing that, if they set the goals inside of the larger goal and self reward, each one of those, they essentially have an infinite amount of energy to pursue those goals. They have an infinite amount of focus to pursue those. You see this most in the Special Operations community and people that are selected especially for this process. One thing that's been intriguing to me. I have some friends from the SEAL Teams and I don't begin to, you don't really understand that the real work that they do deployed cuz I never done that kind of work. But I've always been intrigued by the selection process, the so-called budget process, right? Because carrying logs and getting cold water and all that. That's not really how the work is. That's really not what the work is about to. The selection process is interesting because everyone shows up fit motivated and convinced that they're not going to quit. And I think like There might be a couple of just show up to show off but everybody is absolutely convinced and then a very small subset of them make it through and I'd be willing to bet that the ones that make it through. Of course, they're greedy and resilient, but they all are essentially, right. So that's necessary but not sufficient. Obviously. Otherwise, they everyone would make it through the people that make it through somehow, or able to tap into a process. Maybe it's a reward process. Maybe it's through self-punishment. Maybe it's through self, reward in the positive sense, but they're able to control something inside environment that is not controlled. By the time, it's controlled by the by the instructors. And I've always been struck by the fact that in order to learn to not in order to get through, you just have to not quit. Remember people are being deselected. They're not saying, get out of here. You're not good enough, you know, people are deciding that for themselves. And so it's interesting because it brings about a real-world experiment of people who are quitting. And I believe they're quitting because they can't manage these neurotransmitters and the people. And when I say manage, I think that the people that get through knowing some of these people quite well, had an internal process by which they could reward themselves. We're doing something that might have just looked trivia with everybody else. But he gave them more gas more energy. Right? Right. And what's interesting is the process to eat the kind of unconscious Genius of of the buds process is that they pick to sensory events that are across the board challenging for everybody. One is cold water, which is great, because most of the time I can't kill you right now, like, heat which can kill you. It's cold water and sleep deprivation. And so the ability to do these like what I'm calling TPO cyst duration, cough and outcome, steps and procedures is great on when you're rested, you know, do you know when you have a well-fed while slapped, you can do anything, you can be in any hard conversation, you can work through anything. What they do is they start taking the autonomic nervous system, which is these deep reserves of the nervous system. That when are autonomic nervous system is off. It starts making us pay more attention to how we feel, then the demands of the world around us. Remember that basic challenge of the nervous system and sleep deprivation is the best way that you can pull somebody down from their ability to analyze duration pathan outcome and reward themselves sleep. Deprivation is the way in which he was a Pull-A-Part, the nervous system and the way that it wants to function because it's very easy again, rested to do all this but see what they do with their sleep deprived people that put them in cold water. They're trying to get them more in touch with the way that they feel inside than what they need to do in response to the external demand everyone. I know that's made it through that process. Did it slightly differently, but I'll tell you how they didn't do it. They didn't do it through sheer grit and determination. They did it through attaching a sense of meaning. They did it by Mike Rowe, slicing the day or slicing the day into a series. Meals that they just need to get two and then rewarding themselves for getting to that next Milestone. So they don't know. I mean, most of them, you know probably had very little concept of dopamine and norepinephrine but that's the process. That's also the process. I think they lost 1-0 to finish an ultra. I never run in Ultra, but I think that process of self reward is grit and resilience and I kind of neurochemical definition and I think it's nothing that anybody can tap into and I think it's therefore I think it's it's so cute because I think people think that it is so cute. That people understand scuse me that these circuits are not unique to people who run Ultras or people that make it through, you know, stringent filter, Special Operations Command video. It's the same thing that the ultimate determinant isn't your physical conditioning and yet that's what everybody focuses on. Its what's going on in, you know, internally mentally neurochemical e, that's making the diff. The people that are able to best calibrate that and find these strategies for managing that are the ones that get through, whether it is an ultra or bud and Bud has like this perfect. It's almost like it's only right? For studying human resilience in a certain respect that you have actually taken so far these people and tested them in your lab including David Goggins, right? So what it, what it, what it, what do you do when you, when these people visit you and you're like, I'm going to deconstruct you hear figure out what makes you tick. Yes. I had the Good Fortune of meeting David at a Consulting event a few years ago. And I guess I should just say David. You probably know this already but he is every bit as intense as he comes across. As what you see, is what you get really wonderful. And obviously extremely impressive, human being. David and the night before we had this event. He came out to the lab my lab. We do, we study fear. We study courage, we say resilience and it said the underlying neurochemical substrates for those who made a bunch of guys, there a couple Team guys. Some other folks, and we bring them in this little room and we do virtual reality there. And one of the things that we used to scare people or did generate a sense of autonomic arousal? Is this experience of diving with great white sharks, which of course, you're not in water in the laboratory, but it's very immersive. And for people that are afraid of sharks, it it can be quite scary, not always but we also have Heights. We have claustrophobia. We got something. Where you can feel spiders, crawling all over your body. If you want to Rack in the photo with ya. If you have a pain point we find it went. I'm trying to figure out what that pain point is we do and we do it through some very covert methodology that involves a i and some tools. Right. All right. Let's just say this from the moment, you step in our laboratory work. We're studying you. So the wise and what we were going to do, and and David said it was, I don't like sharks. And I, all right. Well, then why I'm so I just kind of it at one point and finish describing, what the check is and how we're going to wire people in. And then I said, so who wants to go first? And he's like, I'll go right? Of course. It's funny to me at that moment. I realized this is interesting because he was very explicit about the back. He didn't like sharks is very explicit about the fact that he was going to be first UniFirst, man, in. I mean, it would be inappropriate for me to describe his data, right? And we didn't do a full-blown experiment. But what I can say is whatever it is that David has figured out how to do it. Clearly involves taking whatever. Adrenalinn pulse, he feels and understanding something fundamental to biology. Renalyn response was designed to move us, not to keep a stationary. He uses Behavior as the way to shift, sensation, perception, feelings, and thoughts. He understands how to run that program in the right direction. Where is most people when they don't like what they feel, they start negotiating sensation, which will never work. They start trying to control their perception, which is hard right there. Like I'm not going to think about that. I'll think about it differently. Very hard to control the mind with the mind. He knows. That's a tough one. Feelings. Lord knows what those are and how to control them. I mean, we will eventually figure that out as a field, but thoughts are complicated. So, he just goes immediately. He says, just for clarity, when he says, I don't like sharks. He's basically saying put me in the Shark Tank, like he's killing you to say. This is the thing. I'm afraid of and I'm going to be the first one to volunteer and I know you're going to put me on Shark Tank if I tell you that exactly. And I think and I obviously can't speak for him. But one of the things I think is very clear that he's tapped into this, neural plasticity process through the the door through the portal of agitation and stress. He's figured out that didn't, this is really the Holy Grail of Neuroscience is how can I modify my brain? Well, you modify it by placing yourself into discomfort and using that as a propeller to move you into action and you know a couple years later when David was working on his book and I heard the book was coming out. I think I saw a pre-release now. I texted him. I just had like I'm really excited to see your book and he said great. Thank you. You know, it be great. If you write something bad like I'm happy too and you said but, but I need it tonight. And this was Saturday at 10:30 at night when I texted him. So it's okay. Well, I would be happy to do it. Now by midnight to do I start writing this thing in these are short blurb. So I kind of realize that you know, you want to get it right. And you know, my name is next to it and it want to do it, do it justice. I'm sitting down. I'm working on the saying, I text him looking to be a few minutes late. No problem. No problem. Finally send them nothing like 12:30 at night. Thank you. And then I realized that that time he was living in New York. And I said, wait a second. Where are you? Is it New York? And I said it's 3:30 in the morning. It's undisputable. This guy lives, the Persona that he projects into the world. And even that day. Consulting gig, you know, there was a 4 lag and he was like, no, let's keep going. So, he's figured something out. And I think that his enormous popularity. Is it CERN? Because he's figured out that. It really doesn't matter if you come at something from a place of joy and love and that would be wonderful. But there's a whole other set of ways to approach this that involves slogging through the discomfort, the doubts, the wish for things to be different and starting with behavior, and its incredible. Cuz if you think about sensation perception feeling, thought and behavior, actually the way to control our nervous system and feel the way we want to feel, is the run that backwards Behavior. Thoughts of you change your behavior than General. Your thoughts, your feelings, and your perceptions change and everyone tries to I'm at it from the other end, but he's figured out through whatever process. Let him there and incredible life circumstances how to run it in this direction of behavior. First. I really think that if Neuroscience has anything to offer, its some understanding of what the underlying chemicals in neural circuits are, but the sooner that the human-animal, the human species can start to understand that are our feelings in our thoughts and our memories in our all that is very complicated, but that wouldn't behaviors are very concrete and they are the, the control panel for the rest of it. I don't want to relegate feelings, feelings are extremely important. I don't want to relegate perception. They're extremely important, but when it comes to wanting, to shift the way that you function to get better or to, perform better show up better, or to move away from things, like addictive behaviors. It's absolutely foolish for any of us, me included to think that we can do that by changing our thoughts first. It's the hay. If your first thoughts feelings and perceptions follow mood follows action, mood follow my Mantra forever. And, you know, I swear by it and David's example illustrates that that act, first, he's developed so much neural plasticity that it's reflexive for him to just move towards the hard thing or the challenge or the discomfort. Right? And now the science establishes that this is indeed the case. And yet our programming, our default hardwiring is to put us in this place where we want to ruminate on all this stuff and wait until we feel like doing something before we do it or check our motivations for it. But anytime I'm in a funk where I want to change my state. I have to move forward, I have to do something with my physical body in order to shake things up and you know rearrange whatever is going on mentally. So And it, and it works every time, it works every time because the the brain circuits meeting sets of connections and chemicals are there from birth to their your whole life and they were designed for that. So, in 2018 graduates to my lap published a paper in nature showing that in the face of a physical threat, There are three options. You can obviously freeze you can Retreat or you can move forward and the moving forward response. Actually triggers activation of a connection in the brain to the dopamine circuitry of the brain and makes it more likely that you're going to be able to move forward in the future. Now, what was interesting to us was that not only as forward action rewarded at a neurochemical level, which then sets you up for more forward action, but the highest level of agitation and stress was associated with moving forward. We always think if I just call myself enough, I'll be able to move forward but it's the exact opposite, you know, and so people who are paralyzed in fear or that have a hard time initiating. Sometimes the key is to raise the level of stress and agitation is my deadlines are so effective, right? This is what I fear is so effective is why that deer gets up out of its, you know, nice little den and starts to move because it feels a certain level of agitation if that education isn't high enough, we Will not move forward and some especially in the US. And we have a culture in which stress has been created the universe ideas around stressor. That is that it's terrible for us, when in fact, stress is designed to move us forward towards these action, steps that are rewarded with some moves forward and so on. So what is the process of of combating that you know, monkey mind that is near running whatever narrative that's keeping. You stuck. Like it's easy to say like just move you got to take the action but a lot of people still despite understanding that intellectualizing that are unable to you know, basically, Act as if yeah, I think we're dealing with two general categories of people who have problems with motivation and focus and I think we failed to decide. Excuse me. I think we failed to describe the fact that there are two groups and not one. We think. I need to call myself enough to move forward. I think, and then other people say, well, no, you need to kind of a self up to move the way. I conceptualize it, based on the data that I'm aware of. Some people are just hypo aroused, they're just not motivated enough and those people would benefit greatly from cultivating practices like super oxygenated breathing. So, this is something along the lines of like to mow type breathing. So, rapid, and we look at this and allow, we're actually running a human study on this now. So, 25 or 30. Deep breaths through the nose and out through the mouth, then exhaling a breath and holding learning to how to self generate adrenaline. That's what you're doing. Acme cross without is Mackenzie talks about buffers the immune system against infection, but getting good at taking yourself from Lowell low energy to higher energy, and then learning how to compress your focus and I'll try but the focus thing in a minute. Some people are so educate, the monkey mind. You got too many things going on in their thinking, okay. They're trying to sit down and write I suffer from this and I'm feeling like wait. I've also got this person. I need to connect with and I'm kind of being drawn off-course but not being able to put the blinders on for people that have that issue. I think learning how to calm the nervous. System is very powerful in the best way that I know how to do that is based on two studies, one published in nature, won publishing's cell reports recently showing the physiological size. There's actually a thing in the literature call physiological. Size are one of the fastest ways to bring our overall. Wolf's about anomic arousal down, and a physiological side. Is it to inhales followed by an extended exhale. So it's like, It's not just a deep breath. It's a two inhales followed by an Excel. Okay, and then what what that does? And this is been shown several times. Now in humans and other species as well as it dilates, that the loss actually belongs and that s in hell that likes them a little bit more and it pulls a little bit of carbon dioxide out of the blood streams that when we exhale, we offload, the maximum amount of carbon dioxide and a perfectly adjust. The ratio of carbon dioxide and oxygen in the blood stream and lungs. And sometimes it only takes one of these double inhale, exhale. Sometimes somebody needs to do two or three, but that's the fastest way to bring the autonomic nervous system down. A lot of people need such a tool because I think we talked a lot about meditation and tools for Cam and now I can go to ask someone for a weekend and get a massage. I'm going to feel very good. But then when I'm throwing back in real life, I need something that's going to work in a real time. When I call real time tool and most people don't know how to control your autonomic nervous system because it's complicated. I can't control my liver function. I can eat that will call me but that has complicated the you know issues with it too. If I'm just eating the call myself. So the diaphragm is the one skeletal muscle, organ. That was internally, right? We got obviously skeletal, muscles is on the move things. It's a skeletal muscle organ. Unlike the spleen, the liver, the heart etcetera. It was designed to be moved out voluntarily, and these physiological size, or actually occurring, fairly regularly during sleep to adjust our levels of carbon dioxide and oxygen. And there's a recent study showing that in claustrophobia. This is the breathing pattern that people default. Define offload that carbon dioxide. So we're out there a lot of really interesting breathing techniques, wim.hof. Brian McKenzie does great work. Patrick McEwen. You know, what the Laird and Gabi to tons of people. Doing really interesting things out there. My life has been focused on what are the neural circuits that are designed to achieve particular states that happened to impinge on and capture diaphragm function. And so, the reason I think breathing is so powerful as that. Everyone has a diaphragm. And it's the immediate link to the body, A. Lot's been made of the vagus nerve. You know, how do with the Vegas is the path between the body and mind. But the Vegas is very slow. Vagus nerve calming, is what you experience. When you eat a really rich a carbohydrate-rich meal or your, you had a long day and you and you put your feet up and you're finally relaxing, it takes minutes to hours to kick in whereas the diaphragm is real-time control over your brain state, so The brain knows what the body is doing by how fast the diaphragm is moving, and knows its overall. Activation States, when you breathe quickly, those twenty-five or Thirty brass. The brain says, oh, I must be alert. I'm going to start secreting some Norah Jones one and when you re slowly that level of noradrenaline drops down, so it sounds so simple, but I think it's only in the last two or three years that my lab and Mark Rosen. I was allowed at Stanford and other labs elsewhere in the world have start to identify the neurons in the brain that are linked to breathing and how those two things relate to one another. And I think everybody should have a kit of tools that they can use to bring themselves to and wrap themselves up. I'll just say one other thing about Focus. So when we're in a high alert State, something very powerful happens that I think partially explains your, your ability. Now to drop into this book writing. When there's a certain amount of adrenaline in our system are pupils dilate, the eyes are not connected to the brain, or eyes are actually two pieces of central nervous system. They are two pieces of bread. Outside the skull that were designed to control our overall arousal State. And so we can talk about this as it relates to sleep and Sleep Quality, but when I bring up the level of adrenaline in my body through breathing or let's say, I see a troubling text or let's just say I I just use a very Goggins type of approach and just figure out the most painful inspiring for me, reason to do it, you know, it sounds because, obviously, David, I don't know what goes on in your head, but a tremendous respect for your ability to do that, but you just ratchets himself out of that ditch and puts himself in motion, the pupils dilate. And when that happens, our visual system, actually enters something that's a little bit, more like portrait mode, on our phone. There's a process called accommodation and your ability to focus on one thing visually actually becomes better and your ability to see everything else blurs away. And that's the ability to just see that screen of text where that if you work on, you know, pad and paper to just see that pad and paper. And then, as you start writing, what people don't realize is that mental focus follows visual focus on people at slightly different. It follows, auditory Focus. But in most people, your visual Focus as you bring that into really sharp relief that image of your book and you start, you're going to feel some agitation in your mind, can be jumping all over the place. But if you wait just a couple minutes, the rest of the world will disappear. I think this is sort of like the Flow State. People are looking for. Remember, the Gate of Entry is one of what you have to Wade through some some sewage before you can swim in Clearwater, right way, I always think about it, but the visual focus is what brings the rest of the brain into cognitive focus and people in the martial arts, understand this, you probably experienced this running when you're feeling exhausted and you can just concentrate on one Milestone and get there. You can almost bring that into like you what you're doing is you're linking that to the dopamine circuits. You're saying is that thing is the Milestone, not winning the race, not some other thing outside this, this immediate environment that thing. And when you're able to start capturing these peripheral circuits, meaning the body diaphragm, the visual system, then you start getting past this whole idea of the mindsets and it really becomes about the body setting the mind, and this is where I think, when you say action leads the rest, right? It's. So what you're saying is a is grounded in real? No, no biological data. There's also a shift in your perception of time when you're in that state, you know, suddenly your relationship with time becomes completely different. So I'm I'm really glad I'm not like it slows down or up to me. It's neither here in this weird liminal state where it's almost like it doesn't exist. It's not it's not a relevant like vector in your in your emotional experience. I'm really glad you brought this up because of one of my obsessions this time perception. And you know, having spent the last twenty years or so. Studying the visual system. What you start to realize is that space meeting physical space, not outer space, but physical space around you and your time perception are absolutely linked. And when our focus is very narrow time starts to feel in sliced. So it's you're right. It's not that it's going fast or slow. Its that you're perceiving more events per unit time. So it's like a metronome that's going faster when our gaze is dilated. So when we're relaxed, there's actually a, what happens is the pupil kind of relaxes a bit. It doesn't always get bigger or smaller. But what happens as we were when we relax with you, view Horizon, for instance or you going to be what's called panoramic Vision. So even though I'm looking at you right now, I can dilate my gaze without moving my head her eyes. So I can see the corners of the room in the ceiling. I could see myself in the environment when we do. Our perception of time broadens. And we feel like we have more time and what we're doing when we do that Focus vs. Defocus as I call it or vocal Vision versus panoramic vision is your toggling on and off the autonomic nervous system for alertness, you're turning on and off that is that Norman Efrain circuit. And so it's conscious control over a brain stem circuit. And is why I don't like the phrase autonomic cuz that means automatic. It's a misnomer. The breathing I can control my autonomic nervous system. I can breathe. I can control my own number in her system. I can eat a big meal. I can control my system. I can focus or defocus. And if we really look at the realm of high-performance, what you start to realize is people who are very good at their respective. Sport or career or in the Special Operations, to me, what they do are exceptionally good at turning it on and off the system. So they're highly functional at achieving their Milestones, but they're not spending out extra energy because when you go into panoramic Vision, you start to uncouple the space-time thing and you get some rest and relaxation. The way to think about this is so we go back to duration Patton outcome. That's the most stringent High Focus regime for the brain, the way to get better at duration path. An outcome is to engage in activities that are low duration and I'll come where your brain is not in modes of analyzing duration, path and outcome. What's the one phase of our life when we're not thinking about duration, path and out? Come at all. Sleep. And so the reason why you can pull somebody's mind apart their ability to think rationally and analyze duration path, and outcome by Sleep, depriving them is because sleep, despite all its neurochemical complexity is really when we restore our ability to analyze duration path and out. Come now you think about Buds and you don't know where they sleep deprived, and they're trying to figure out who has the ability to control these mechanisms and who doesn't most people fail. So when I think about how to recover, I actually don't think about recovery at as its own thing, I think about recovery as giving buoyancy or improving my ability to focus. So, sleep is a turning off of these brain circuits that are thinking about what's happening next to some people experience, challenges and falling asleep. They need to learn how to turn off thinking, and there's actually a way to do this. Then we're doing a study on this now. It relates to hypnosis that will be fun to talk about. We can if you like the other thing is that just merely going in the panoramic Vision. Say between a meeting instead of looking at your phone more focal Vision. You're working hard on your book, maybe walk to the kitchen 2 seconds of the. Look, what I caught deliberate decompression, where you just kind of let your mind go. Broader will allow you to reset your focus much more intensely. When you return to to that book as a post. If you look at your phone or engaged, even in some other kind of deep duration, path, outcome type function of the brain. So when you start thinking about meditation, it's also valuable, because a lot of meditation involves focusing on your breath. Actually think, a lot of people are are spending out this ability there there. Working too hard in their the activities designed to reset them. Are the two ways to reset yourself in wakefulness. Just very adamant about my meditation practice. That's right. It's a letting go, it's not. All right. So, you know, it's a were so programmed alike, force ourselves to do things or the like dive in with intentionality. But so much of this is more elusive than that. I think that we can all do ourselves, a great service, and perform much better. And what we're doing by taking little micro, recoveries in the form of violating our gaze in between meetings, just for a second viewing, a horizon is the best way to do it because it naturally brings the eyes into defocus. We're doing this in VR cuz we can control the visual environment completely when you go into the deep focus mode. You turn off that brain, stem circuit your conserving norepinephrine for your next bout of focus and activity. Otherwise, you're spending it and the brain doesn't care how you spend. It doesn't care if it's on Trim doesn't care if it's watching the news but learning how to defocus there and then refocus very quickly can get you through a race that you wouldn't otherwise have been able to get through. It saves you energy and it and it builds energy. The other thing is we talked a lot about sleep, and sleep is extremely important, but there are other modes of and brain states that can allow you to recover. One of the ones that I'm a huge proponent oven that my lab has been studying. And other labs are studying is what many people call Yoga Nidra, where you it's a wonderful practice, you know, just lying down and focusing enough of your attention so that you don't fall asleep and enough of your attentions on and moving it around. So that you're not really concentrate on any one thing. I fall asleep. Every time I do too, I do too, but we know it. So I fundamentally disagree with respectfully though with the idea that we can't recover sleep, that we've lost. Just what are we really talking about there? For me? It's the Perform. These duration pass out coming out to sea. So in my lab, we have people to a cognitive tasks and then we place them into these very deep states of relaxation through things that are kind of like, you're going to drink and people can find Yoga Nidra. Script out there. They're everywhere on YouTube elsewhere or we have to do. Hypnosis script. Hypnosis is very similar deep relaxation wondering sort of attention fairly narrow context, but it brings the brain into these unique states where you're neither sleep, nor awake. And for people that have trouble falling asleep or trouble relaxing themselves. These kinds of practices are extremely useful because they're really teaching you how to turn off those most focused. So, you know, we we live in a stress Society, some people stress cuz they're overwhelmed but other people are stressed because I just don't know how to turn off their brain and fall asleep. And if you want to learn how to turn off your brain and fall asleep, these practices are immensely. Use, how do you practice hypnosis by yourself, though? So there's some Scripts. I would recommend people go to one of those scripts on YouTube or there's some good ones. I've never met him. I don't have any relationship to Michael sealey. Sealey on Australian guy has some really good hypnosis scripts, audio programs. Listen to them and you walk off a cliff or anyting. No, close collaboration with a guy named David spigel, who's in our Psychiatry Department. We're now, looking at how daily breathing exercises can impact people, sleep and levels of stress? He's done a lot of work on addiction and Trauma and Pain Management through hypnosis. And most all of hypnosis that's clinical involves bringing one state into one of deep relaxation, not full sleep. And then thinking about some behavioral change, that one wants to make these are ancient practices really. And I think that they were developed by people that understood that rewiring of the brain requires. Focus and depressed. What's interesting about hypnosis. Is, it brings those two things together at the same moment. So normally you'll work really hard on something, work really hard, then you'll sleep and that's when the plasticity occurs, but hypnosis likely accelerate that whole process by having people interested of deep relaxation and focus at the same time and allows those circuits to reshape themselves and their some published at Tappan David slab, to support that. So I think these practices are really useful and I think that if you want to get better at performing, everyone now knows things to Matt, Walker's book and others like sleep more sleep better, but we have trouble sleeping well or falling asleep. Well, we wanted to find what that is. Some people have a hard time turning off their thoughts. It's really hard. Remember you can't do it. What you can do is to learn to control that perceptual window and distribute it so that your sense of time starts to kind of drift off and you end up in sleep more easily and it's a practice that most people find if they do it for 10 minutes a day or so, they start sleeping. Better within within a week or, you know, and sometimes more than some people need some other help. Like not drinking caffeine too late in the day etcetera, but that brain state of know duration about an outcome analysis, is going to be the most restorative and you can get in wait for us to. So taking a walk or you're just letting your mind go is very powerful. And the other thing that's powerful is optic flow. So, self-generated optic Flow by walking, running or cycling. Shifts the brain into a state of relaxation. That's not seen when your stationer. This is. Well. Well described in the Neuroscience lecture. For some reason is not well described in the wellness literature, but it's a real thing. When you move through space in your active year. There's a natural calming of the brain circuits involved in threat and threat detection. This is the basis for EMDR. I move into sensitization reprocessing, the lateralized eye movement. They have people doing the clinic that kind of goofy looking thing. While I found out that lowers stress and the, the the rationale is that by coupling a low-stress state. To the recall of the trauma. It's going to allow people to reshape their relationship to the trauma to tolerate that the discomfort and EMDR. My clinical colleagues. Tell me works, best for Fairly well-defined traumas is not going to be like my childhood or, you know, a whole series of events, but for single event traumas or trauma, that's repeated. But of the same sort, it seems to work best. It's not going to work. That's a completely reshape all relationships to all traumas, but it does seem to be powerful for a certain people would be afraid to get in a car or something like that. Right? So you hate this person and, and you submit them to this therapy where they move their eyes back and forth laterally, which seems absurd things goofy, right? This is supposed to help them get over there, Their Fear, their blockage, so, Okay, so my lab studies vision and we study stress and states of mine and people used to talk to me about a.m. Dr. And asked me about you and Bri was like, this is crazy. This isn't right or drug makes no sense. Why would move in the eyes from side to side, have any impact on states of mine. That's ridiculous. But then what happened was in 2018 to 2019 and 2025 quality manuscript came out in very good journals from groups that were studying eye movements, not studying stress, or trauma. That found that these lateralized eye movements. Not up and down the ladder. Last time, movements quiet, the activity of the amygdala, the limbic structure in the brain, that's primarily responsible for threat, detection, and stress. And I was like, oh my goodness. This thing might actually be real. Then I started to dig into the backstory of this and there was a woman named Francine Shapiro who came up with this idea. Actually walking behind Stanford in the Stamford Hill. She was a therapist and she figured, she had this idea based on the fact that she didn't feel as upset about certain things. When she was walking that this might be useful. And she was smart enough to know that these lateralized eye movements or what reflexively occur anytime. We're in Arctic flow. We don't realize it cuz they're so consciously generated and they're very subtle but she realized she couldn't really take people walking on their therapy session so she could but it's not really practical. It's raining etcetera. So what you decide to do was to bring the eye movement component to the clinic and have them move their eyes from side to side while they would recount these traumas and people experience tremendous benefit. And in fact, now there's a lot of evidence to show that these lateralized eye movements, really do quiet, the stress of the nervous system and allow people to continue to move forward. This is probably all anchored. I go back to that story, that dear then need something and as it's feeling that agitation and gets up and starts moving the movement, feeds back onto the brain to quiet that Stress and Anxiety, so it can be observant of its environment and that panoramic mode is what we are in when we are in a position to be very situationally what I wear when we're stressed, we are going to have is so distraught over the world, but I'm one thing this relates directly to addiction because I spent some time at addiction treatment clinics and talking to people in the community and it's very clear that, of course, there are a huge number of factors that play into why people come become addicted and relapse etcetera, but if you can get at people's ability to control their anxiety, and their feelings of peak States and happiness, you, you don't guarantee, but you helped reinforce the possibility that they're going to get sober and stay sober. As an addict gets more Tethered to the idea that some substances, the thing they need the progressive narrowing of the things that bring them pleasure and everything else. Kind of Falls away like portrait mode on the phone. They're essentially in a state of high stress trying to meet that dopamine need all the time and they don't see other possibilities. The reason I mention not just stress and treating stress to get out of fiction, but also pleasure is that we've also seen this when do people relapse when they're feeling really good when they're feeling really lousy and stress and when they're feeling really good. I've been sober for five years. We hear about this in the news usually from celebrity example of people been doing great, all the sudden they're back in treatment. Like what happened? What happened? Was the dopamine circuit from other things, may be a great life of enter things are going well or stress. The loss of a job. Everything crashing puts our visual system and the rest of our brain into a myopia. We become meat, we literally become nearsighted and the dopamine system says, that's the only thing that's going to get me out of the moat that I'm in. They literally don't see the other possibility. So some of the work that I'm starting to get involved in now is to try and inform the addiction tree. Community the trauma community that there are ways to use action in the body to move people out of states of myopia or nearsightedness and this is kind of a cognitive and allow them to start parsing their time, perception differently. It hard. Young goes right back to time perception. When an addict needs something, their sense of time is fixed to the retrieval of that thing, you know reaching that thing and it when they can dilate their sense of time. They realize they have time for other options, but until you can dilate that there's really no chance for you. Can't find a way. I can't find a way. You can tell somebody you're going to lose your kids and they'll do it anyways, and I just tells us we need another route to it. And so one of the things I think it's powerful as to think about how can we Leverage The visuals? How can we leverage the diaphragm system in the same way that you would tell a you know, somebody who's in you know has cancer or needs a surgery of a certain sort? Like we need to leverage certain. Technologies, well, we need to leverage certain inborn, Technologies respiration, and vision to be able to access states of mind that will allow us to make better choices for the attic in that really nearsighted view fixated. There is no other choice and I think those early years of skateboarding and being, you know, feral it showed me that the people I knew that became addicts. And frankly. I know some adults who have become addicts, even whoever I couldn't function of Lies. It wasn't just them. Those people, you know, we like to think they're making a bad choice and they had their making a bad decision. It's unclear to me whether or not they have a choice in those highly myopic states of mine and see what we need to do is we need to dilate their perception of the world around them. We need to dilate their perception of time. We need to learn, they need to learn how to relax themselves, so they can actually see other options and it all relates to how the visual system. The breathing system relate to autonomic function addiction is the is the perfect serve laboratory to do this and it's so important I think because if it were simply the case that people just needed family support and which they do and they needed, you know, encouragement and they need discouragement about making the wrong behaviors. This, we wouldn't be having this thing. I think all of those are are, you know, really powerful tools and important things to look at with respect to the addict mentality or that disposition there has to be a level of self-awareness in that attic that the decision to pick up the drink, or to use the drug begins so far in advance of the actual Behavior. By the time, they actually pick up that drink. There's no getting in the way of that, like, that decision has so much momentum behind it, that it's almost impossible to reverse o a breathing technique or any techno. Adapt juncture is unlikely to be successful. So it's about recognizing, you know, when that state is starting to shift in that direction, whether it's days or hours, or weeks before the behavior choice to intervene out of his is out of place in time, when you can actually have an impact. I agree. I think that it's always an uphill battle with addiction at least at first, but even know just given that the numbers on relapse. And I think every what was it? That someone once told me? I don't know if this is actually true, but for most people but he said a recovered. Addict told me, you know, you know that everyday, he tells himself no matter how far I drive. I'm always the same distance from the ditch and there's a, a, some verbage around that you'll get community. That is very valuable. I I can't recall it off the top of my head, but they talk about the Great support that one can get from learning to access brain. States of timelessness sleeping very restorative wakeful, deliberate disengagement being very restorative, maybe meditation, maybe 30 minutes or maybe through simple quick breathing techniques, but being able to dilate in contract, one sense of time and not being a lock to one kind of space-time regime. The ability to recognize that I'm not seeing clearly, right? I see what I see but I I don't know what, I don't see the ability to introduce that understanding for somebody can be very powerful and I think we need to give them tools that they can look to very quickly. I don't think we're ever going to have a treatment for addiction that's in the form of a pharmaceutical. Like one pill because if you start tapping into the dopamine system itself, you start degrading other aspects of life. So I think one of the reasons why diction treatment is so complicated, is that you need many elements, but the elements that come from, Person themselves are ultimately the the most important ones, of course. And I think physiology and Neuroscience does have some tools that can lend support to that that every couple years. You see, new science, emerge on addiction. And there's some new protocol and you know, 12 steps constantly getting thrown under the bus in 12 steps of got me sober and I'm very rooted in that Community. I remain open to other, you know, modalities and protocols, and super interested in seeing where all of this is going. But I think it is important to appreciate how complex it is. Like there is a trauma element to it. There's a dino behavioral modification element to it. There's a emotional it, like, how do you, how do you find a way to Anchor? This person to a life that has meaning and purpose and all of these things inform is complex, you know, soup that's going on in their head that the dictator Are there going to pick up a drink or not? And you know, and I love the Neuroscience Community with a YouTube in my family and home for many years now and the people working on addiction. Or are you motivated from the right place? And they are in working exceedingly hard there, a lot of data. Now that show your friends since they are complete genetic changes in the cells that can do you know and the pathways they controlled dopamine and reward and that's all wonderful. Understand. But meanwhile, I think there are enough tools out there that they need to be aggregated way. That's structured in the addiction. Treatment communities can can leverage what are things that would be of great use is the ID of a biomarker. So you described that, you know, when it's really beautiful example of how wouldn't some early on? You might be able to intervene but later it gets much harder. We need biomarkers that are going to tell us for some people or their family that somebody's at risk. Is regulating their own autonomic nervous system. You can predict pretty well whether or not they're going to Succeed or fail in making good decisions. And so I do think of whoop, type device or other sensor device could be tremendously, beneficial in detecting and telling people whether or not they are veering off course, and I think it's getting very Minority Report though. It is. I think machines are going to help us make a lot of decisions that were actually pretty poor at making, but the simplest of those that we might see in the next 2 or 3 years is saying, look, you've been working extremely hard on your book, you're doing very well, but you're going to need an extra hour's sleep. I mean, that's essentially what we doing for you or 12 hours are going to make a bad decision to 12 hours, going to make a decision or even killing you, or injured, or in certain might in there, right? You might make a bad decision so that you're more aware and you're going to devote a little more mental energy to the concert decisions. You're making. I think that is a lot of all-nighters and I still do unfortunately my career writing grants and so forth and I have this rule that I learned. Josh, about 15 years ago, which is I don't trust any of my thinking that occurs between 3 a.m. And 7 a.m. If I've been up all night. I just don't trust it cuz I started in the world falling apart. Start thinking the word is misspelled. I mean, I didn't really know I'm sleep-deprived when word like the look misspelled and then I'm like, you going on that's that duration. Pat outcome. Circuitry starting starting to fall apart if I think that that's an extreme example, but I think that short of having people buffer their lives with tons of activities and perfect nutrition in perfect. Social interaction, people learning to control their autonomic nervous system. I think is really the next step in our species Evolution. I really believe that. What we are seeing now in the world is a call to arms if you will, or a request from Mother Nature to have everybody learn how to control their autonomic nervous, system a little bit better or ideally, a lot better. Critical, I think me right now, irrespective of what's going on with the pandemic and the political climate in the protest and all the upheaval that we're seeing. As a culture were experiencing an extraordinary Poverty of attention and focus were so distracted. By our devices were more anxious and stressed and depressed. And we ever have been before this is not going in a good direction and to the extent that we can commandeer a little bit more control over these things and understand that we have some level of agency and we can reverse this serve automatic pattern that were on of just scrolling endlessly. And you're doing what we're doing, that we know is not leading us in a good direction, is critical if we're going to find our way forward into to speak of a little bit. So what's going on right now, I think, you know and it's related and I'm interested in your thoughts on you know, the nurse. Signs that that is, you know, I think relevant to this is that we've lost the ability to have civil discourse. There's a real breakdown in communication right now, culturally and socially, and it's fractured or society and it's not, it's, it's not good, right? So what is going on neurologically with human beings that are attaching themselves and I'd so self-identifying with certain narratives that it's polarizing our population and preventing us from being able to just be together or United or agree. Upon. What is true and what is not true and Share value system so that we can see our way through the challenges that we're facing right now. Which many of which are our existential threat to the future of humanity and the planet. It's a huge problem. You articulate articulated, it beautifully and I think Neuroscience can offer a couple insights into why it's happening and perhaps what we might do about it. So one of the scientific results that I'm very intrigued Buys in the 1960s, a guy named Robert, Keith recorded from the human brain deal, deep into the brain, all over the brain and people can stimulate wherever they want and they just report with one lever. They feel drunk, another lever. They feel happy. They press another lever. They feel sexually aroused and they're reporting all this bike. When was this done in the 1960s and 1960s several times, actually and published twice essentially the same data. Different populations in the journal science, which is sort of our Super Bowl science and nature sell. Those are the two big ones internal threat. That is. So the number one brain area that people want it stimulate. They finally hit this lever, where they go. I like that and they just keep hitting that thing and hitting that thing and hitting that thing frustration and Mild anger happy. I could be. I'm going to choose frustration and anger exactly. It's what that told us is. It's clearly tapped into the dopamine reward system. It feels like a hit of dopamine to them more than anything else. So we need to put that on the shelf and keep it visible as we kind of March into this sort of answer to your question. The other thing isn't understanding that and there's some recent date on this that are really impressive, not for my lab, but from another lab, which is that beliefs and information, that supports our prior beliefs, also increases the activity of these reward systems. So the more I see stuff that verifies would I already think or feel that they are bad and they are good or that we are good and they are bad, the more dopamine and adrenaline is real. Send in my system, which we now know from our discussion, a few minutes ago, changes the way I view the world. It actually changes the way I view the world. It means that I'm going to see certain things and not see others and this also released the auditory system. I'm going to hear certain things and not hear others. The things that verify my beliefs are awarded for the things that are counter to my beliefs. I'm not going to be it's rewarded for. So we have all these barricades to empathy and really listening and a really hearing what the other side is trying to say. And we have all these support networks, in our body, in our brain, which are building a bigger and bigger / very depressing. So the question is what's the boat that's going to get us across that divide and I believe and I am not just defaulting to this cuz it's what my lab works on but I fundamentally believe that the boat that's going to get us to the other side, is our ability to control our internal state to be able to ratchet. AR level of autonomic arousal just enough so that I can dilate not just my vision of what's happening in my immediate environment, but I can dilate my cognition, my thinking to the possibility, that there may be a kernel of value in what somebody else is saying, even if it's about me, and I don't like what I'm hearing. Now, for somebody who spent time in the addiction treatment Community, you you probably know this is a lot of what you get good at as you learn to move through something that to you feels very good and, you know, all the reasons why would probably be good to change it. But you know what? You don't want to because it feels so good. So we're talking about an addiction to entrench thinking, we're talkin about an addiction and neurochemical systems that support lack of change my refusal to change and stubbornness and I actually think just like an for the treatment of addiction and Trauma. The key is to get people to learn to tolerate progressively higher levels of stress, and maintain dilation. Sensory experience of fog experience. We've got to create some small little portals through which information can come in. A lots of Native American neurons. I hate to break it to the crowd, but the data in support of mirror neurons in humans is not that impressive. And now the mirror neuron people going to come after me. But fine, there are circuits in the brain that control, emotional contagion and those are what's powerful? My ability to recruit you into stress. Is much more powerful than my ability to recruit you into empathy for something good. That's a well-established, neurobiological fact, or empathy for for for someone's perspective that You know, that I'm fundamentally going to disagree with, right. So I think there are three gates to getting there and by there, I think, you know, I'm referring vaguely to the idea that we need to increase our level of understanding at least our level of discourse so that we can hear other really hear other people's ideas, even though we don't like the way it feels. And we love the way that we feel. This is the end result that we love the way we feel. We don't like the way other people feel. The first thing is to bring the level of urgency that we feel internally down. We need to learn to calm ourselves in order to really have the information start to come in now, that's system right now and people out there every once in a frenzy and you can see it. Our Collective Collective conscience is is kind of losing its mind. It's kind of out of it to my, we need to learn how to turn off those circuits. Are we all going to get together and do EMDR? Probably not. Are we all going to get together and do breathing exercises? Probably not, not at scale. We need to do is start to figure out. How we can, I think a special for the next generation of kids, how to teach them to regulate their nervous system. So that they recognize that pulse of adrenaline as placing them in a compromised position. Like we have to leverage the idea that being able to hear and listen hinges on the ability to be calm. So therefore the ability to be calm is crucial to hearing and listening and hearing and listening is crucial to our advancement as individuals in his group's. The problem is everyone's been trying to do this backwards. They said we all have to get along. We have to cancel cancel culture. We all have to eunos listen to one another. And I think again we have to start from the inside. We have to teach it physiologically. Now, I don't have a master plan on how to do that. But one of the reasons I'm here and one of the reasons I'm teaching the restaurant on Instagram and not just in my laboratory is until we can learn to regulate the self. I don't think we're going to get where we want to go as a culture. I think it really does start with our own individual, a bill. To do that. And so, you know, Dave is a really good example, for instance, of somebody who learn how to deal with his own internal mess and build something beautiful out of that and he continues to do that and everyone's got to find that process for themselves and whether or not you have a perfect family or whether or not you consider yourself, the most inclusive and accepting person in the world or not. Everyone needs to learn how to do that for themselves. And everyone thinks we do it pretty well, but I think it's clear that none of us. Do it. Well enough so hard. And I like arousal, autonomic arousal, autonomic control. I think those are the entry points for addiction for trauma and for really empathic hearing and listening. And until we do that. I think our species is going to continue to go around this Merry-Go-Round where every fifty or a hundred years. We crash right up against the same general set of issues. Only now, social media has made it slightly more a lot more complicated. It's it's a little bit similar to what you were talking about in terms of the Seeking external, validation versus, finding it within yourself, like essentially, the protocol, the prescription that you just gave has a strain of Buddhism in it, in the sense that the world's going to change when we change ourselves like the best most impactful way that you can make a difference for the world is to focus on being the best version of yourself. How can you comport yourself in a way that allows you to be more receptive than objective and empathetic and able to listen and hear? And and I think it's true. It's 100% true. And then I think about the person losing their shit and, you know, Target or whatever, Over The Masks or whatever. It's insane video. Clip of the day. I happen to see on social media and I think we're doomed, like, is this person going to do that? No, I can't control that. I can only control myself and I worried that when the onus is on the individual to solve the problem. That that we're not going to find our way through it. Right? Like we, obviously need organizational institutional on systemic changes. We need to change the way these social media platforms were called the way in, which were delivered information in the way than which were siloed. But I don't have any control over any of those things. The only thing I have control over is my own internal mechanism. So what other choice do we have by? Then we need people in positions of power and Leadership who are very good at internal control. You know, I think emotions are great. I experienced them often intensely. But thank you. They're not always wonderful to experience. But I think it's clear that the level of autonomic arousal that's associated with emotions, either very high or very low, very happy or very sad, very anxious, or very angry. Clouds our judgment. It's very clear. And I think the sooner that you have too much, Credence to they're just feelings, man. Like, we don't have to allow them to overtake us and monopolize everything that we do, they were designed to push us along certain behavioral paths, but they, they've grown in importance in the last few years and in a week to get into a discussion about how, you know, social media marketing or designed to be in a capture. These very deep limbic aspects of ourselves and they are. But what's amazing is, an important is that everybody has a for some people. To submit seems there's more developed than others, but everybody has one and we have this capacity for we call top-down control, which is the ability to intervene in our own feelings. It's in our own actions dates and to set some some rigor and some some real clear marks with that. We were out to achieve. And I think it's going to start with the the generation. That's very plastic. Most parents are afraid of stressing their kids because they don't want to. You know. Again, I went to high school where kids literally Gunn High School in the last 10 years kids have over a dozen train track suicides. So those are kids that are committing suicide for different reasons, but a lot of them is cuz they just feel too much pressure. So obviously we can't, you know, we can't pressure kids beyond their capacity to regulate but The idea that all of our internal State should be driven by external things. That's that's a foolish McStuffin also. So I think we need to operationalize what we're going to teach the Next Generation, you know, maybe our generation isn't really Rescue level, but maybe the next generation is. And if they understand that there's some Concepts that sound a little mushy, like gratitude or mindfulness for these kinds of things. But as long as they understand that Prince's gratitude which we done rich on it involves a whole other than our transmitter reward system in the Rain, the serotonin system which offers us against injury, it can improve wound repair. You can allow us to lean back into these, high-stress regimes learning and your kids learning how to toggle their nervous system back and forth between highly, you know, duration pass outcome-focused states of trying to improve and learn and then learning how to really relax and chill out and enjoy and be socially connected because it will allow them to ratchet. Talking and focus with extreme depths I think in doing that, we might not get every child to learn how to do that. But if we can distribute that information widely enough and there's so many Brewing examples and beautiful as yours. David's many, others of people that have been able to tap into those systems intuitively. If we can get that information out there. I really believe that at least a subset of those kids will grow up to be the leaders that our species really needs in order to get through this next filter. And right now, we're feeling the stringency of that filter and I think our level of autonomic disregard it, as of species, the fact that were there were here right now, says, okay. Here's the here's the tasks. Are you guys going to figure yourself that you got this for? Bring my dog doesn't have the forebrain. I've got you can't figure it out, but we can work this out and it'll involve Technologies, like devices to measure how we're doing, maybe some machines to guide that this a different discussion, but I think it's entirely possible. And I think that's the evolutionary pressure that we're in right now. And I think that the Next Generation, if they can hear about it and learn about it. It's going to meet that demand. Our species has done it for every other demand. I toggle back and forth between extreme optimism in and you know dystopian despair because on the one hand, you know, you described the experience of going to therapy and you know how that was kind of, you know, novel at that time, but we're not in that place anymore and everybody's got a smartphone and there's no headspace and calm and waking up and all these incredible apps mindfulness is part of the mainstream modern vernacular. Like these kids are growing up. Not only aware of these practices but amenable and you know, they're there it's it's being done in the households in which they're being raised, which I find to be. You know, that's an amazing thing. I think there is a Consciousness that is emerging out of these young people that I hope. And then, you know, I just think about the endless scrolling in the associate and I'm so I can. I think it's clear that most people younger old, are content to be passive, consumers, and spend out their dopamine doing essentially meaningless activities and consuming our food and consuming air and light. That is basically damaging them and they I don't think they care. I think there are species. Let's be fair or species. Is it be interesting if some other species around the area where the curators of the planet. So I think that our species is probably divided into those that are really going to try to maximize on this gift of neuroplasticity. Right? We're the only species that has neuroplasticity throughout the lifespan and that Neuroplasticity in childhood last as long as it does, as a function of our total Iceman. Incredible. So we were gifted this and I think some people leverage it and take advantage of it and other people don't. And I think we need to accept that we're not going to get everybody. But what we need to do is attach the reward systems of Society, financial socio-economic, Etc, to the kinds of behaviors that are going, is going to give rise to people that can lead us into the next hundred years are in a hundred years. Now, that is not saying, oh, do away with monetary systems are actually the opposite. I think that, once people start to realize that your high-performing military military or high-performing athlete, your high-performing academics, your high-performing business people. They actually have practices that they used to regulate themselves to in order to not just perform better, but sleep better, not just to sleep better, but to listen better, not just listen better, but incorporate ideas, that allowed them into states of creativity and states of mind that Really lead to new and exciting ways that humans can interact and the many people just be consumed as if everything they produce. What's, what's great about New Media is that we, we democratize access to this information and were able to realize that that these people are not just freaks of nature, but that they have a methodology and they've created, this can end this tool kit and these practices are available to everybody and you have people like David who are explaining this and very plain terms that it is within your power to take advantage of these things to take better control of your life. And we never seen anything like that before in the history of humanity. And I think that that you know, that bodes well for the empowerment of the Next Generation as well, I do too. As you can probably tell him, I'm optimistic I have to be because otherwise I can't justify the work that we're doing, but I think that there's so much interest now. In Psychology in the brain and the self in physical fitness. Which, you know, I think it's fair to say is inextricably linked to mental Fitness and the fact that people are so curious about what other people are doing and what are the past success success. And you know, what are the resources for trauma and addiction? I think there's been a kind of swarm of information. It's been hard to sort through, but I think 2020 is, are you know, it's ours or call me to call to arms and I cuz I guess I I do feel that way. It's very serious. This is this is serious business and this is the time for us and the Next Generation to step up and you know, and to lead people toward a place where they we can function better, and where the next generation will reflexively function better. That's a beauty of Early Childhood is that if some of the stuff is taught in past off, it's not to be perfect, but there will be a generation of people coming up, that will naturally understand stressing out to Tatian. Taking them off their game and leading the bad decisions will make the appropriate adjustments. I know people that will read David's book in your book and we'll see the possibility of doing something differently with it with a terrible childhood or a brutal addiction. And you know, I think we need more stories of success. I think it's easy to look out there and see all the things that are going wrong and we need to keep paying attention to those. But we need these beacons that draw people forward. And I say that from a place of experience in books. In the bookshelf, I'd there was no online back then or inventors. And, you know, you have two for, you know, it. I think it's that they have to have that forging capacity. They can't just sit there and wait for it to rain on them or for a parent to dump it on them, but I trust that they're out there and they're going to figure it out, just like on on Instagram. You dropping these videos basically every day, right? Like more less little lessons on Neuroscience. I'm trying, I'm trying to show people that I have a kind of know acronym. Also, I don't like embedding things in a lot of complex language, sometimes about how their brain works. How it interfaces with psychology different goals and purposes in the world, but assigned to serve normal people and then hopefully signs that something I think really science has something to offer, but it's not going to happen. If I'm vaulted in my lab, for my papers are red by the 12. People that care enough to read the paper start to finish, right? So I'm doing it there are others out there. Of course, David Sinclair is doing it so I can pandas doing it. I'm trying to recruit more people from the scientific Community to do this. I think it's our responsibility. You paid for it. It's your tax dollars, you know, there's a tremendous cost to doing science. That is not often discussed, but I don't really consider it an option. I consider it my obligation and I'm going to keep going. Well, keep doing that man. I appreciate the work that you're doing. I think it's really important work. We need it now more than ever and it's cool that you're getting out there and Ensure. On your wisdom with everybody. It's super empowering. So thanks man. That she ate it, really appreciate the best way to find him is I'm bringing him here after we got three like 10% of it. So I just I just was getting out of the way, a man to listen to what you have to say. I appreciate it. Thanks, man. Thank you. Peace.
